Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB907.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1510(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1510. Issuance and content of driver's license.(a) [General rule] Issuance.--The department shall, upon payment of the required fee, issue to every qualified applicant a driver's license indicating the type or general class of vehicles the licensee is authorized to drive and any endorsements or restrictions, which license, except as provided in subsection (j), shall contain a distinguishing number assigned by the department to the licensee, the actual name, date of birth, residence address, blood type, a color photograph or photographic facsimile of the licensee, such other 1234567891011121314151617 information as may be required by the department, and either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write his usual signature with pen and ink. Program participants in the Address Confidentiality Program under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 67 (relating to domestic and sexual violence victim address confidentiality) may use a substitute address designated by the Office of Victim Advocate as their address. Personal medical data and other information for use in an emergency may be included as a part of the license. Information other than that required to identify the licensee, the distinguishing number and the class of license issued may be included in microdata form. Except as provided in subsection (f), an applicant shall include his Social Security number on his license application, but the Social Security number shall not be included on the license. No driver's license shall be valid until it has been signed by the licensee.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0907PN0948 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718